Colorado, session 2026A, SB153.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Schools play a critical role in preparing students for academic
achievement, postsecondary education, and participation in the workforce;
(b) Students' ability to succeed academically is often influenced by
personal, developmental, and social challenges that may affect school
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

engagement and learning;
(c) The social, emotional, and behavioral health needs of students
in Colorado schools have increased significantly in recent years. Failing to
address these needs affects students' academic success, school attendance,
safety, and long-term well-being.
(d) School counselors provide essential services to students and
schools by identifying and confronting obstacles to student learning and
supporting students with social and emotional development, academic
planning, and career and postsecondary readiness;
(e) In many schools, particularly in rural and smaller districts and
underserved communities, a licensed school counselor is often the only
readily available professional whose preparation includes training in
counseling practices and student development;
(f) School counselors are increasingly called upon to perform risk
and safety assessments, provide short-term counseling and crisis
intervention when tragedy strikes a school, coordinate services with families
and community providers, and support students experiencing trauma and
other behavioral health challenges;
(g) Because of these responsibilities, it is important that individuals
seeking licensure as school counselors receive comprehensive
graduate-level preparation that includes coursework in counseling practices,
student development, and strategies to help students experiencing stress,
behavioral challenges, or other barriers to academic success;
(h) National standards for counselor preparation, including those
established by recognized accrediting bodies, typically require graduate
programs of at least sixty semester credit hours and include coursework
related to mental health counseling, assessment, and crisis response; and
(i) Establishing minimum graduate credit requirements will help
ensure that school counselors entering Colorado schools possess the
knowledge and skills necessary to support students effectively.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that establishing
minimum graduate-level preparation requirements for licensed school
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-153

counselors is necessary to provide effective student services, promote safe
and supportive learning environments, and ensure that students across
Colorado have access to well-prepared school counseling professionals.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-60.5-210, amend
(1)(a)(I)(B) as follows:
22-60.5-210. Types of special services licenses issued - term.
(1) The department of education is designated as the sole agency
authorized to issue the following types of special services licenses to
persons of good moral character:
(a) Initial special services license.
(I) The department of education, in its discretion, may issue an
initial special services license to any applicant who:
(B) Has met the standards of the state board of education concerning
academic and professional preparation, and experience, and performance,
as appropriate for the subject matter area or areas for which such THE initial
special services license is to be endorsed; EXCEPT THAT, TO QUALIFY FOR
SPECIAL SERVICES LICENSURE WITH A SCHOOL COUNSELOR ENDORSEMENT,
AN APPLICANT MUST HOLD, FROM AN ACCREDITED INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, A MASTER'S DEGREE OR HIGHER IN SCHOOL COUNSELING THAT
CONSISTS OF AT LEAST FORTY-EIGHT GRADUATE SEMESTER CREDIT HOURS.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-153

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-153